Missouri, session 2026, HB2632.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 375.918, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 375.918, to read as follows:
375.918. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adverse action", a denial, nonrenewal of, or a reduction in the amount of benefits
payable or types of coverages under any contract, existing or applied for, in connection with
the underwriting of insurance. An offer by an insurer to write a contract through an affiliated
insurer does not constitute an adverse action;
(2) "Contract", any automobile insurance policy as defined in section 379.110, or any
property insurance policy as defined in section 375.001, including such a policy on a mobile
home or residential condominium unit or a policy of renters' or tenants' insurance. Contract
shall not include any policy of mortgage insurance or commercial insurance;
(3) "Credit report", any written or electronic communication of any information by a
consumer reporting agency that:
(a) Bears on a person's credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity; and
(b) Is used or collected wholly or partly to serve as a factor in the underwriting of a
contract;
(4) "Credit scoring entity", any entity that is involved in creating, compiling, or
providing insurance credit scores;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2632 2
(5) "Insurance credit score", a numerical representation of the insurance risk a person
presents using the person's attributes derived from a credit report or credit information in a
formula to assess insurance risk on an actuarial or statistical basis;
(6) "Insurer", any insurance company or entity that offers a contract;
(7) "Underwriting", the selection of the risk that will be assumed by the insurer on a
contract, and specifically the decision whether to accept, deny, renew, nonrenew, reduce, or
increase the amount of benefits payable or types of coverages under the contract.
2. An insurer using a credit report or insurance credit score as a factor in underwriting
shall not take an adverse action based on such factor without consideration of another
noncredit-related underwriting factor.
3. No insurer shall take an adverse action against an applicant or insured based on
inability to compute an insurance credit score without consideration of another underwriting
factor, unless the insurer can justify the credibility that the lack of an insurance credit score
has in underwriting to the director of the department of commerce and insurance.
4. An insurer using a credit report or insurance credit score as a factor in underwriting
a contract shall disclose at the time of the original application for the contract or on the
application itself that the insurer may gather credit information.
5. An insurer using a credit report or insurance credit score as a factor in underwriting
of a contract shall not take an adverse action on such contract based on information that is the
subject of a written dispute between the policyholder or applicant and a consumer reporting
agency, as noted in such person's credit report, until such dispute has reached final
determination in accordance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section
1681, et seq. In the event that information is the subject of a written dispute under this
subsection, the sixty-day period provided by section 375.002 or section 379.110 shall be
extended until fifteen days after the dispute reaches final determination. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to require any consumer reporting agency, as defined by the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq., to include any information
on a credit report beyond the extent required by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15
U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq.
6. If the use of a credit report or insurance credit score on a contract results in an
adverse action, the insurer shall provide the policyholder or applicant:
(1) Notice that a credit report or insurance credit score adversely affected the
underwriting of the contract;
(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the consumer credit reporting
agency that furnished the credit information, in compliance with the notice requirements of
the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq.;

HB 2632 3
(3) Notice of the right to obtain a free credit report from the consumer credit reporting
agency within sixty days; and
(4) Notice of the right to lodge a dispute with the consumer credit reporting agency to
have any erroneous information corrected in accordance with the federal Fair Credit
Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq.
7. Within thirty days from the date the insurer provides notice of an adverse action
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of this section, the applicant or insured may in
writing request from the insurer a statement of reasons for such action. For purposes of
determining the thirty-day period, the notice of an adverse action is deemed received three
days after mailing. The statement of reasons shall be sufficiently clear and specific so that a
person of average intelligence can identify the basis for the insurer's decision without further
inquiry. An insurer may provide an explanation of significant characteristics of the credit
history that may have impacted such person's insurance credit score to meet the requirements
of this subsection. Standardized credit explanations provided by credit scoring entities
comply with this subsection.
8. If an insurer bases an adverse action in part on a credit report or insurance credit
score, the applicant or insured may within thirty days of such adverse action make a written
request for reunderwriting following any correction relating to the credit report or insurance
credit score.
9. An insurer may obtain and use a current credit report or insurance credit score on
new business or renewal contracts, but shall not take an adverse action with respect to
renewal contracts based upon such credit report or insurance credit score until or after the
third anniversary date of the initial contract.
10. Insurance inquiries shall not directly or indirectly be used as a negative factor in
any insurance credit scoring formula or in the use of a credit report in underwriting.
11. Nothing in this section shall be construed as superceding the provisions of section
375.002 and section 379.114. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting any
insurer from using credit information in determining whether to offer a policyholder or
applicant the option to finance or establish a payment plan for the payment of any premium
for a contract. Nothing in this section shall apply to any entity not acting as an insurer or
credit scoring entity as defined in subsection 1 of this section.
12. No credit scoring entity shall provide or sell to any party, other than the insurer,
its insurance company affiliates or holding companies, and the producer from whom the
inquiry was generated, data or lists that include any information that in whole or in part is
submitted in conjunction with credit inquiries about consumers. Such information includes,
but is not limited to, expiration dates, information that may identify time periods during
which a consumer's insurance may expire, or other nonpublic personal information as defined

HB 2632 4
under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. Sections 6801 to 6809. The provisions of this
subsection shall not preclude the exchange of information specifically authorized under the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq., the Gramm-Leach-Bliley
Act, 15 U.S.C. Sections 6801 to 6809 and other applicable federal law. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to data disclosed in connection with a proposed or actual sale,
merger, transfer or exchange of all or a portion of an insurer's or producer's business or
operating unit, including but not limited to, the sale of a portfolio of contracts, if such
disclosure concerns solely consumers of the business or unit and such disclosure is not the
primary reason for the sale, merger, transfer or exchange.
13. A violation of this section may be enforceable under section 374.280.
100 14. The provisions of this section shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after
101 July 1, 2003.
102 15. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any contract that is
103 an automobile insurance policy as defined in section 379.110 that is entered into on or
104 after August 28, 2026, no insurer shall utilize any information obtained directly or
105 indirectly from a consumer reporting agency or any insurance credit score that relies on
106 information obtained directly or indirectly from a consumer reporting agency for the
107 purpose of determining the rate charged for such contract.
✔